Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 59. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, § 10; 1B M.J. Animals, §§ 2, 10.

§ 3.2-5900.
Definitions.

As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Accredited veterinarian”
means a veterinarian approved by the Administrator of the U.S. Department of Agriculture in accordance with 9 C.F.R. Part 161, which includes the authority to issue health certificates.

“Animal”
means any organism of the kingdom Animalia, other than a human being.

“Hatching egg”
means any egg of any chicken, turkey, waterfowl, or game bird, or the egg of any other avian species that is used or intended to be used for hatching purposes.

“Horse”
means any stallion, colt, gelding, mare, or filly.

“Livestock”
includes all domestic or domesticated bovine animals; equine animals; ovine animals; porcine animals; cervidae animals; capradae animals; animals of the genus Lama or Vicugna; ratites; fish or shellfish in aquaculture facilities, as defined in §

3.2-2600

; enclosed rabbits or hares raised for human food or fiber; or any other individual animal specifically raised for food or fiber, except companion animals.

“Passport”
means a document that may be used in lieu of a Certificate of Veterinary Inspection and shall contain animal identifiers and health maintenance history such as vaccinations and laboratory tests.

“Poultry”
includes all domestic fowl and game birds raised in captivity.

“State Veterinarian”
means the veterinarian employed by the Commissioner as provided in §

3.2-5901

.

“State Veterinarian’s representative”
means any person who is either: (i) an employee of the Department under the direction of the State Veterinarian; or (ii) a veterinarian deputized pursuant to §

3.2-5901

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-4, 3-13; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-4, 3.1-14; 1972, c. 531; 1975, c. 260; 1977, c. 186; 1978, cc. 219, 540; 1982, c. 150; 1984, c. 492, § 29-213.36; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.66; 1988, c. 538; 1991, c. 348; 1993, cc. 174, 455, 959; 1994, cc. 261, 370; 1995, cc. 10, 610; 1996, c. 996; 1998, c. 817; 2002, cc. 351, 500, 787; 2003, cc. 544, 551, § 3.1-741.3; 2003, c. 1007; 2005, c. 633; 2008, c. 860; 2019, c. 258.

Cross references.

As to acts of bioterrorism against agricultural crops or animals and penalties, see §

18.2-46.7

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 258 inserted “or Vicugna” in the definition of “Livestock.”

§ 3.2-5901.
State Veterinarian and representatives.

The Commissioner shall employ and direct a veterinarian who shall be known as the State Veterinarian, whose duties shall be to carry out the laws of the Commonwealth and the regulations of the Board and the Commissioner. The State Veterinarian and his representatives shall have the power to carry into effect all lawful orders given by the Board or the Commissioner.

The State Veterinarian may deputize, for a specific period of time, licensed veterinarians, veterinarians employed by the Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine, and veterinarians in the employment of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-565; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-723; 1978, c. 396; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5901.1.
State Animal Welfare Inspector.

The Commissioner shall employ and direct at least two licensed veterinary technicians, each of whom shall be known as the State Animal Welfare Inspector (the Inspector) and shall have the duty to carry out the tasks assigned to him pursuant to Chapter 65 (§

3.2-6500

et seq.). The Inspector shall have the power to carry out the laws of the Commonwealth and the regulations of the Board and the Commissioner.

History.

2020, c. 1284.

§ 3.2-5902.
Certificate of veterinary inspection required for importation of certain pet animals; examination; exceptions; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to import into the Commonwealth from another state any pet animal, including dogs, cats, monkeys, or other animals, ferae naturae, wild or tame under domestication or in custody, or any poultry not intended for commercial use that by its nature is fit for use only as a pet, unless such animal is accompanied by a certificate of veterinary inspection issued by an accredited veterinarian. Such certificate shall be on an official interstate certificate of veterinary inspection issued by the state of origin, shall be dated no more than 10 days before shipment, and shall contain such evidence of proof of the health of the animal as the Board, by regulation, may require.

Any animal imported into the Commonwealth without a certificate may be examined immediately by the State Veterinarian, his representative, or a licensed veterinarian designated by him, and the examination cost may be charged to the owner or the person in possession of the animal. If, in the opinion of the State Veterinarian or his representative, there is danger from contagion or infection, the animal may be placed in quarantine at the expense of the owner until all danger of infection or contagion has passed, whereupon the animal shall be released upon the order of the State Veterinarian or his representative.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any ornamental aquarium fish or invertebrate animal, or an animal accompanied by a passport approved by the State Veterinarian. The provisions of this section shall also not apply to: (i) any animal as herein defined passing directly through the Commonwealth to another state in interstate commerce, or when such animal is kept properly under control by its owner or custodian when passing through the Commonwealth to another state; (ii) any animal brought into the Commonwealth by a resident or by a resident of another state who intends to make his residence in the Commonwealth except if brought into the Commonwealth with the intent of offering it for public sale, trade, or promotional incentive; or (iii) to any animal brought into the Commonwealth temporarily for the purpose of hunting or legal exhibition within this state.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-576.1; 1964, c. 153; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-735; 1993, c. 174; 2001, cc. 311, 333; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5903.
Laboratory for diagnosis of diseases.

The Commissioner shall maintain and operate a laboratory system for the diagnosis of diseases of livestock and poultry, and for such other uses and purposes as may be determined by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-567; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-725; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5904.
Authority of the Commissioner; coyotes; black vultures.

The Commissioner may enter into agreements with local and state agencies, or other persons for the control of coyotes, black vultures (
Coragyps atratus
), and other wildlife that pose a danger to agricultural animals. The Commissioner shall enter into an agreement with the federal government to establish and maintain the Virginia Cooperative Wildlife Damage Management Program.

History.

1990, c. 682, § 3.1-796.67:1; 2008, c. 860; 2010, c. 761; 2016, c. 59.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 429, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall work cooperatively, and with federal, state, and local agencies, as may be advisable, to provide information and promote programs that are available to landowners, livestock producers, and other individuals who are seeking assistance with coyote control concerns.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 761 substituted “local and state agencies” for “local, state and federal agencies” and added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 59 inserted “black vultures (
Coragyps atratus
), and other wildlife” and substituted “establish and maintain” for “restablish” and “Wildlife Damage Management Program” for “Coyote Damage Control Program.”

§ 3.2-5905.
Compensation for animals slaughtered or animals or animal products destroyed to control or eradicate an animal disease outbreak.

When, in the judgment of the State Veterinarian, it is necessary for the control or eradication of an animal disease outbreak to slaughter or destroy animals or destroy animal products affected with or exposed to such disease and when the Commissioner determines that there should be compensation to owners and, when applicable, individuals contracted by the owners to produce such animals or animal products for loss thereof, the Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, may, within his discretion, use funds so appropriated to pay to the appropriate persons a portion of the difference between the appraised value of each animal destroyed or slaughtered or animal product destroyed and the total value of the salvage thereof and any compensation made for each animal or animal product by the federal government.

History.

2006, c. 443, § 3.1-741.7; 2008, c. 860.